North Carolina, session 2025, HB209.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding G.S. 66-58, G.S. 115C-518, and Article 12 of
Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, or any other provision of law, and subject to the restrictions
set out in this act, the Durham Public Schools Board of Education and the County of Durham
may enter into a partnership, joint venture, land trust, or similar arrangement with each other to
construct, provide, and maintain affordable housing on property now owned by the Durham
Public Schools Board of Education or by the County of Durham.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding G.S. 66-58, G.S. 115C-518, and Article 12 of
Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, or any other provision of law, this act authorizes the
Durham Public Schools Board of Education and the County of Durham to convey property owned
by either local government or both local governments to such partnership, joint venture, land
trust, or similar arrangement for the purposes of constructing, providing, and maintaining
affordable housing for Durham Public Schools Board of Education teachers, sworn law
enforcement officers, or other first responders employed by local governments in Durham
County and, if units remain available, to Durham Public Schools Board of Education employees.
The Durham Public Schools Board of Education and the County of Durham shall not transfer
property acquired on or after the effective date of this act by eminent domain to the partnership,
joint venture, land trust, or similar arrangement created pursuant to this act.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding G.S. 66-58, G.S. 115C-518, and Article 12 of
Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, or any other provision of law, Durham Public Schools
Board of Education and the County of Durham, or the partnership, joint venture, land trust, or
similar arrangement created pursuant to this act, may contract with any person, partnership,
corporation, or other business entity to finance, construct, or maintain such affordable housing.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding G.S. 66-58, G.S. 115C-518, and Article 12 of
Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, or any other provision of law, the Durham Public Schools
Board of Education, the County of Durham, or the partnership, joint venture, land trust, or similar
arrangement created pursuant to this act may enter into residential housing unit lease agreements
at reasonable rents for the housing units constructed, provided, maintained, or leased pursuant to
this act and may in its discretion charge below-market rates. The Durham Public Schools Board
*H209-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
of Education, the County of Durham, or the partnership, joint venture, land trust, or similar
arrangement created pursuant to this act shall restrict the rental of such units exclusively to
Durham Public Schools Board of Education teachers, sworn law enforcement officers, or other
first responders employed by local governments in Durham County and, if units remain available,
to Durham Public Schools Board of Education employees. Of housing constructed, provided,
maintained, or leased pursuant to this act, at least seventy-five percent (75%) of housing units
shall be reserved for use by Durham Public Schools Board of Education teachers.
SECTION 5. This act shall not exempt any affordable housing units constructed,
provided, maintained, or leased pursuant to this act from compliance with applicable building
codes, zoning ordinances, or any other health and safety statutes, rules, or regulations.
SECTION 6. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 209-First Edition